Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6330
Violations; action to enjoin.

Upon the request of the department, the Attorney General or appropriate county attorney shall institute without delay an action in the name of the state for proceedings appropriate against any individual or firm to restrain or prevent any violation of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act or of any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 178;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1282.